Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 13. Drunken Driving
§ 1206.
Suspension of license for driving while under influence; first conviction.

First conviction—generally. Except as otherwise provided, upon conviction of a person for violating a provision of section 1201 of this title, or upon final determination of an appeal, the court shall forward the conviction report forthwith to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. The Commissioner shall immediately suspend the person’s operating license or nonresident operating privilege or the privilege of an unlicensed operator to operate a vehicle for a period of 90 days and until the defendant complies with section 1209a of this title.

Extended suspension—fatality or serious bodily injury. In cases resulting in a fatality or serious bodily injury to a person other than the defendant, the period of suspension shall be one year and until the defendant complies with section 1209a of this title.

Operation during suspension. During a suspension under this section, an eligible person may operate a motor vehicle under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued under section 1213 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1973, No. 79

, § 6, eff. May 23, 1973;

1975, No. 103

, § 3, eff. May 30, 1975;

1979, No. 58

, § 2;

1981, No. 103

, § 7;

1983, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 50;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 192.

§ 1207.
Repealed.
1973, No. 79, § 9, eff. May 23, 1973.

§ 1208.
Suspensions for subsequent convictions.

Second conviction. Upon a second conviction of a person violating a provision of section 1201 of this title and upon final determination of an appeal, the court shall forward the conviction report forthwith to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. The Commissioner shall immediately suspend the person’s operating license or nonresident operating privilege or the privilege of an unlicensed operator to operate a vehicle for 18 months and until the defendant complies with section 1209a of this title. However, during the suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued pursuant to section 1213 of this title.

Third conviction. Upon a third or subsequent conviction of a person violating a provision of section 1201 of this title and upon final determination of any appeal, the court shall forward the conviction report forthwith to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. The Commissioner shall immediately revoke the person’s operating license or nonresident operating privilege or the privilege of an unlicensed operator to operate a motor vehicle for life. However, during this lifetime revocation, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued under section 1213 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

1973, No. 79

, § 7, eff. May 23, 1973;

1975, No. 103

, §§ 4, 5, eff. May 30, 1975;

1977, No. 101

, § 2, eff. May 6, 1977;

1979, No. 58

, § 3;

1981, No. 103

, § 8;

1983, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1989, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. May 14, 1990;

1991, No. 55

, § 7;

1997, No. 56

, § 5, eff. Aug. 1, 1997;

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 51.

§ 1209.
Repealed.
1973, No. 79, § 9, eff. May 23, 1973.

§ 1209a.
Conditions of reinstatement; alcohol and driving education; screening; therapy programs.

Conditions of reinstatement. No license or privilege to operate suspended or revoked under this subchapter, except a license or privilege to operate suspended under section 1216 of this title, shall be reinstated except as follows:

In the case of a first suspension, a license or privilege to operate shall be reinstated only:

after the person has successfully completed the Alcohol and Driving Education Program, at the person’s own expense, followed by an assessment of the need for further treatment by a State-designated counselor, at the person’s own expense, to determine whether reinstatement should be further conditioned on satisfactory completion of a therapy program agreed to by the person and the Drinking Driver Rehabilitation Program Director;

if the screening indicates that therapy is needed, after the person has satisfactorily completed or shown substantial progress in completing a therapy program at the person’s own expense agreed to by the person and the Driver Rehabilitation Program Director;

if the person elects to operate under an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate, after the person operates under the RDL or certificate for the applicable period set forth in subsection 1205(a) or section 1206 of this title, plus any extension of this period arising from a violation of section 1213 of this title; and

if the person has no pending criminal charges, civil citations, or unpaid fines or penalties for a violation under this chapter.

In the case of a second suspension, a license or privilege to operate shall not be reinstated until:

the person has successfully completed an alcohol and driving rehabilitation program;

the person has completed or shown substantial progress in completing a therapy program at the person’s own expense agreed to by the person and the Driver Rehabilitation Program Director;

after the person operates under an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate for 18 months or, in the case of a person subject to the one-year hard suspension prescribed in subdivision 1213(a)(1)(C) of this title, for one year, plus any extension of the relevant period arising from a violation of section 1213 of this title, except if otherwise provided in subdivision (4) of this subsection (a); and

the person has no pending criminal charges, civil citations, or unpaid fines or penalties for a violation under this chapter.

In the case of a third or subsequent suspension or a revocation, a license or privilege to operate shall not be reinstated until:

the person has successfully completed an alcohol and driving rehabilitation program;

the person has completed or shown substantial progress in completing a therapy program at the person’s own expense agreed to by the person and the Driver Rehabilitation Program Director;

the person has satisfied the requirements of subsection (b) of this section; and

the person has no pending criminal charges, civil citations, or unpaid fines or penalties for a violation under this chapter.

The Commissioner shall waive a requirement under subdivision (2) of this subsection or subsection (b) of this section that a person operate under an ignition interlock RDL or certificate prior to eligibility for reinstatement if:

the person furnishes sufficient proof as prescribed by the Commissioner that he or she is incapable of using an ignition interlock device because of a medical condition that will persist permanently or at least for the term of the suspension or, in the case of suspensions or revocations for life, for a period of at least three years; or

the underlying offenses arose solely from being under the influence of a drug other than alcohol.

Abstinence.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, a person whose license or privilege to operate has been suspended or revoked for life under this subchapter may apply to the Commissioner for reinstatement of his or her driving privilege. The person shall have completed three years of total abstinence from consumption of alcohol and nonprescription regulated drugs. The use of a regulated drug in accordance with a valid prescription shall not disqualify an applicant for reinstatement of his or her driving privileges unless the applicant used the regulated drug in a manner inconsistent with the prescription label.
(1) (A) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, a person whose license or privilege to operate has been suspended or revoked for life under this subchapter may apply to the Commissioner for reinstatement of his or her driving privilege. The person shall have completed three years of total abstinence from consumption of alcohol and nonprescription regulated drugs. The use of a regulated drug in accordance with a valid prescription shall not disqualify an applicant for reinstatement of his or her driving privileges unless the applicant used the regulated drug in a manner inconsistent with the prescription label.

The beginning date for the period of abstinence shall be not earlier than the effective date of the suspension or revocation from which the person is requesting reinstatement and shall not include any period during which the person is serving a sentence of incarceration to include furlough. The application shall include the applicant’s authorization for a urinalysis examination, or another examination if it is approved as a preliminary screening test under this subchapter, to be conducted prior to reinstatement under this subdivision. The application to the Commissioner shall be accompanied by a fee of $500.00. The Commissioner shall have the discretion to waive the application fee if the Commissioner determines that payment of the fee would present a hardship to the applicant.

If the Commissioner or a medical review board convened by the Commissioner is satisfied by a preponderance of the evidence that the applicant has abstained for the required number of years immediately preceding the application, has successfully completed a therapy program as required under this section, and has operated under a valid ignition interlock RDL or under an ignition interlock certificate for at least three years following the suspension or revocation, and the person provides a written acknowledgment that he or she cannot drink any amount of alcohol at all and cannot consume nonprescription regulated drugs under any circumstances, the person’s license or privilege to operate shall be reinstated immediately, subject to the condition that the person’s suspension or revocation will be put back in effect in the event any further investigation reveals a return to the consumption of alcohol or drugs and to such additional conditions as the Commissioner may impose. The requirement to operate under an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate shall not apply if the person is exempt under subdivision (a)(4) of this section.

If after notice and hearing the Commissioner later finds that the person was violating the conditions of the person’s reinstatement under this subsection, the person’s operating license or privilege to operate shall be immediately suspended or revoked for life.

If the Commissioner finds that a person reinstated under this subsection is suspended pursuant to section 1205 of this title or is convicted of a violation of section 1201 of this title subsequent to reinstatement under this subsection, the person shall be conclusively presumed to be in violation of the conditions of his or her reinstatement.

A person shall be eligible for reinstatement under this subsection only once following a suspension or revocation for life.

If an applicant for reinstatement under this subsection resides in a jurisdiction other than Vermont, the Commissioner may elect not to conduct an investigation. If the Commissioner elects not to conduct an investigation, he or she shall provide a letter to the applicant’s jurisdiction of residence stating that Vermont does not object to the jurisdiction issuing the applicant a license if the applicant is required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device for at least a three-year period, unless exempt under subdivision (a)(4) of this section, and is required to complete any alcohol rehabilitation or treatment requirements of the licensing jurisdiction.
(6) (A) If an applicant for reinstatement under this subsection resides in a jurisdiction other than Vermont, the Commissioner may elect not to conduct an investigation. If the Commissioner elects not to conduct an investigation, he or she shall provide a letter to the applicant’s jurisdiction of residence stating that Vermont does not object to the jurisdiction issuing the applicant a license if the applicant is required to operate only vehicles equipped with an ignition interlock device for at least a three-year period, unless exempt under subdivision (a)(4) of this section, and is required to complete any alcohol rehabilitation or treatment requirements of the licensing jurisdiction.

If the applicant’s jurisdiction of residence is prepared to issue or has issued a license in accordance with subdivision (A) of this subdivision (6) and the applicant satisfies the requirements of section 675 of this title, the Commissioner shall update relevant State and federal databases to reflect that the applicant’s lifetime suspension or revocation in Vermont under chapter 13, subchapter 13 of this title has terminated.

Screening and therapy programs. In the case of a second or subsequent suspension, the Commissioner shall notify the person that he or she is required to enroll in the alcohol and driving education screening and therapy program provided for in this section within 30 days of license suspension. If the person fails to enroll or fails to remain so enrolled until completion, the Drinking Driver Rehabilitation Program shall report such failure to the sentencing court. The court may order the person to appear and show cause why he or she failed to comply.

Judicial review. A person aggrieved by a decision of a designated counselor under this section may seek review of that decision pursuant to Rule 75 of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure.

Therapy program. A therapy program required under this section may include outpatient therapy, intensive outpatient therapy, and residential therapy. In the event that the individual and the Driver Rehabilitation Program Director cannot agree on the type of therapy required, the Criminal Division of the Superior Court shall make that determination.

Fees. The Department of Health’s Drinking Driver Rehabilitation Program shall assess fees for the Alcohol and Driving Education Program and the alcohol assessment screening required by subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section. The fee for the Alcohol and Driving Education Program shall not exceed $250.00. The fee for the alcohol assessment screening shall not exceed $200.00. In the case of a more intensive or weekend residential program combining both the Alcohol and Driving Education Program and the alcohol assessment screening, the total charge shall not exceed $625.00. Charges collected under this section shall be credited to separate special funds for each type of service and shall be available to the Department of Health to offset the cost of operating the Drinking Driver Rehabilitation Program.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 103

, § 9; amended

1983, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1985, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 68

, § 6;

1989, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. May 14, 1990;

1991, No. 55

, § 8;

1997, No. 55

, § 7, eff. June 26, 1997;

1997, No. 56

, § 8, eff. Aug. 1, 1997;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 63;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 20;

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2007, No. 76

, § 16;

2009, No. 23

, § 1;

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 1, 2011;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 238;

2011, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 17;

2015, No. 50

, § 16;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 46;

2017, No. 71

, § 14, eff. June 8, 2017;

2017, No. 206

(Adj. Sess.), § 8.

§ 1210.
Penalties.

Screening. Before sentencing a defendant under this section, the court may order that the defendant submit to an alcohol assessment screening. Such a screening report may be considered at sentencing in the same manner as a presentence report. At sentencing, the defendant may present relevant evidence, including the results of any independent alcohol assessment that was conducted at the person’s own expense. Evidence regarding any such screening or an alcohol assessment performed at the expense of the defendant shall not be admissible for any other purpose without the defendant’s consent.

First offense. A person who violates section 1201 of this title may be fined not more than $750.00 or imprisoned for not more than two years, or both.

Second offense. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title who has been convicted of another violation of that section within the last 20 years shall be fined not more than $1,500.00 or imprisoned not more than two years, or both. At least 200 hours of community service shall be performed, or 60 consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential alcohol facility pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully completed.

Third offense. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title who has previously been convicted two times of a violation of that section, including at least one violation within the last 20 years, shall be fined not more than $2,500.00 or imprisoned not more than five years, or both. At least 96 consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential alcohol facility pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully completed. The court may impose a sentence that does not include a term of imprisonment or that does not require that the 96 hours of imprisonment be served consecutively only if the court makes written findings on the record that such a sentence will serve the interests of justice and public safety.

Fourth or subsequent offense.

A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title who has previously been convicted three or more times of a violation of that section, including at least one violation within the last 20 years, shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 10 years, or both. At least 192 consecutive hours of the sentence of imprisonment shall be served and may not be suspended or deferred or served as a supervised sentence, except that credit for a sentence of imprisonment may be received for time served in a residential alcohol treatment facility pursuant to sentence if the program is successfully completed. The court shall not impose a sentence that does not include a term of imprisonment unless the court makes written findings on the record that there are compelling reasons why such a sentence will serve the interests of justice and public safety.

The Department of Corrections shall provide alcohol and substance abuse treatment, when appropriate, to any person convicted of a violation of this subsection.

Death resulting.

If the death of any person results from a violation of section 1201 of this title, the person convicted of the violation shall be fined not more than $10,000.00 or imprisoned not less than one year nor more than 15 years, or both. The provisions of this subsection do not limit or restrict prosecutions for manslaughter.

If the death of more than one person results from a violation of section 1201 of this title, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this subdivision for each decedent.

If the death of any person results from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more times of a violation of that section, a sentence ordered pursuant to this subsection shall, except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3), include at least a five-year term of imprisonment. The five-year minimum term of imprisonment required by this subdivision shall be served and may not be suspended, deferred, or served as a supervised sentence. The defendant shall not be eligible for probation, parole, furlough, or any other type of early release until the expiration of the five-year term of imprisonment.
(3) (A) If the death of any person results from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more times of a violation of that section, a sentence ordered pursuant to this subsection shall, except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3), include at least a five-year term of imprisonment. The five-year minimum term of imprisonment required by this subdivision shall be served and may not be suspended, deferred, or served as a supervised sentence. The defendant shall not be eligible for probation, parole, furlough, or any other type of early release until the expiration of the five-year term of imprisonment.

Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), if the death of any person results from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more times of a violation of that section, the court may impose a sentence that does not include a term of imprisonment or that includes a term of imprisonment of less than five years if the court makes written findings on the record that such a sentence will serve the interests of justice and public safety.

Injury resulting.

If serious bodily injury, as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1021(2)

, results to any person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this title, the person convicted of the violation shall be fined not more than $5,000.00 or imprisoned not more than 15 years, or both.

If serious bodily injury as defined in

13 V.S.A. § 1021(2)

results to more than one person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this title, the operator may be convicted of a separate violation of this subdivision for each person injured.

If serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2) results to any person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more times of a violation of section 1201, a sentence ordered pursuant to this subsection shall, except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3), include at least a five-year term of imprisonment. The five-year minimum term of imprisonment required by this subdivision shall be served and may not be suspended, deferred, or served as a supervised sentence. The defendant shall not be eligible for probation, parole, furlough, or any other type of early release until the expiration of the five-year term of imprisonment.
(3) (A) If serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2) results to any person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more times of a violation of section 1201, a sentence ordered pursuant to this subsection shall, except as provided in subdivision (B) of this subdivision (3), include at least a five-year term of imprisonment. The five-year minimum term of imprisonment required by this subdivision shall be served and may not be suspended, deferred, or served as a supervised sentence. The defendant shall not be eligible for probation, parole, furlough, or any other type of early release until the expiration of the five-year term of imprisonment.

Notwithstanding subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), if serious bodily injury as defined in 13 V.S.A. § 1021(2) results to any person other than the operator from a violation of section 1201 of this title and the person convicted of the violation previously has been convicted two or more times of a violation of section 1201, the court may impose a sentence that does not include a term of imprisonment or that includes a term of imprisonment of less than five years if the court makes written findings on the record that such a sentence will serve the interests of justice and public safety.

Determination of fines. In determining appropriate fines under this section, the court may take into account the total cost to a defendant of alcohol screening, participation in the Alcohol and Driving Education Program and therapy, and the income of the defendant.

Surcharge; Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title shall be assessed a surcharge of $60.00, which shall be added to any fine imposed by the court. The court shall collect and transfer such surcharge to the Department of Public Safety for deposit in the Blood and Breath Alcohol Testing Special Fund established by section 1220b of this title.

Surcharge; Public Defender Special Fund. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00, which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by the court. The court shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to the Office of Defender General for deposit in the Public Defender Special Fund, specifying the source of the monies being deposited. The collection procedures described in

13 V.S.A. § 5240

shall be utilized in the collection of this surcharge.

Surcharge; DUI Enforcement Special Fund. A person convicted of violating section 1201 of this title shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00, which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by the court. The court shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to be credited to the DUI Enforcement Special Fund. The collection procedures described in

13 V.S.A. § 5240

shall be utilized in the collection of this surcharge.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

1973, No. 79

, § 8, eff. May 23, 1973;

1975, No. 103

, § 6, eff. May 30, 1975;

1977, No. 101

, § 1, eff. May 6, 1977;

1981, No. 205

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1983, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1989, No. 68

, § 7, eff. Dec. 1, 1989;

1991, No. 55

, § 9;

1991, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 25

, § 25, eff. May 18, 1993;

1995, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. March 21, 1996;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 21;

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2011, No. 56

, § 5;

2011, No. 56

, § 17, eff. March 1, 2012;

2019, No. 32

, § 9;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 193.

§ 1211.
Construction of cross references.

For the purposes of computing offenses under this chapter, references to section 1201 of this title shall be construed to include sections of present or prior law of this or any other jurisdiction that prohibited operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle on a highway while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or both, or while having 0.08 percent or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood or an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 103

, § 10; amended

1987, No. 62

, § 6;

1991, No. 55

, § 10;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4).

§ 1212.
Conditions of release and parole; arrest upon violation.

At the first appearance before a judicial officer of a person charged with violation of section 1201 of this title, the court, upon a plea of not guilty, shall consider whether to establish conditions of release. Those conditions may include a requirement that the defendant not operate a motor vehicle if there is a likelihood that the defendant will operate a motor vehicle in violation of section 1201 or 1213 of this title. The court may consider all relevant evidence, including whether the defendant has a motor vehicle or criminal record indicating prior convictions for one or more alcohol-related offenses. Prior convictions may be established for this purpose by a noncertified photocopy of a motor vehicle record, a computer printout, or an affidavit. Nothing in this section limits the authority of a judicial officer to impose other conditions of release, nor does it limit or modify other statutory provisions concerning license suspension or revocation or the right of a person to operate a motor vehicle.

A court that requires as a condition of release that a defendant not operate a motor vehicle shall so notify the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles. The Commissioner shall take suitable steps to ensure that this information is available to law enforcement officers. The court shall promptly advise the Commissioner of any modification of this condition of release and of the termination of proceedings.

A law enforcement officer who observes a person violating a condition of release requiring that he or she not operate a motor vehicle may promptly arrest the person for violating a condition of bail and shall bring the person before the nearest available judicial officer without unnecessary delay. A law enforcement officer who otherwise has probable cause to believe that a person has violated a condition of release requiring that he or she not operate a motor vehicle shall promptly notify a prosecuting officer.

A law enforcement officer who observes a person violating a condition of parole requiring that the person not operate a motor vehicle may promptly arrest the person for violating the condition and may detain the person pursuant to

28 V.S.A. § 551

. The officer may immobilize the vehicle and shall immediately notify the Parole Board of the suspected violation. If the Parole Board determines pursuant to

28 V.S.A. § 552

that a parole violation has occurred, the Board shall notify the State’s Attorney in the county where the violation occurred, who may institute forfeiture proceedings against the vehicle under section 1213c of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 56

, § 11, eff. May 31, 2011;

2021, No. 20

, § 242.